Alabama, session 2026rs, HB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Parental Right to Participate in Schools Act.
Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) EMPLOYEE. Employee as defined in Section 11-80-16,
Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) EMPLOYER. Any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or business entity that employs one or more
employees within the state.
(3) PARENT or GUARDIAN. Any of the following:
a. A biological mother or father of a child.
b. An individual with legal custody of a child.
c. An individual who acts as a guardian of a child.
d. An aunt, uncle, or grandparent of a child.
e. An individual married to or in a domestic
partnership with any individual listed in paragraphs a.
through d.
(4) SCHOOL-RELATED ACTIVITY. A parent-teacher
conference, school-sponsored performance, rehearsal, sporting
event, or any other school function where the child is a
participant.
(b)(1) An employee who is a parent or guardian may take
up to 48 hours of leave within a 12-month period to attend
school-related activities for his or her child.
(2) The leave may be unpaid or substituted with any
Page 2

(2) The leave may be unpaid or substituted with any
HB21 INTRODUCED
available paid leave, including vacation, personal, family,
compensatory, or leave bank leave, at the discretion of the
employee.
(3) An employee shall provide at least 10 days' advance
written notice of the leave request unless the school-related
activity was not reasonably foreseeable.
(4) An employer may deny leave if granting such leave
would create a substantial disruption to business operations
or make production or service unusually difficult.
(c)(1) Employers shall post and maintain notice of the
requirements of this section in a conspicuous place within the
workplace in a form established, by rule, by the Department of
Workforce.
(2) An employer who willfully fails to post the
required notice may be fined up to one hundred dollars ($100)
for each day the notice remains unposted.
(d) Employees may file complaints regarding violations
of this act with the Alabama Department of Workforce.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3